Nebraska, session 109, LB977.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-676.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-676.01 Vulnerable road user means:
(1) Any pedestrian who is:
(a) On a highway and constructing or repairing such highway;
(b) Working on utility facilities along a highway;
(c) Providing emergency services on or along a highway;
(d) In a crosswalk; or
(e) On the shoulder;
(2) Any individual operating any of the following on or along a highway:
(a) Any bicycle;
(b) Any electric bicycle;
(c) Any motorcycle other than an autocycle;
(d) Any moped; or
(e) Any vehicle or device similar to any vehicle or device listed in
subdivisions (2)(a) through (2)(d) of this section;
(3) Any individual who is riding any animal or driving any animal-drawn
vehicle on or along a highway;
(4) Any individual who is leading, herding, or driving livestock as
defined in section 60-6,378.02 on or along a highway;
(5) (4) Any individual operating an implement of husbandry, including a
farm tractor, that is on or along a highway; and
(6) (5) Any individual who is in a crosswalk or on a shoulder and who is
on any:
(a) Coaster, skate, sled, ski, board, or toy vehicle;
(b) Electric personal assistive mobility device; or
(c) Wheelchair.
Sec. 2. Section 60-6,111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-6,111 (1) Except as provided in section 60-6,378.02, any Any person who
rides an animal or drives an animal-drawn vehicle, a farm tractor, or an
implement of husbandry upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and
shall be subject to all of the duties made applicable to the driver of a
vehicle by the Nebraska Rules of the Road except those provisions of the rules
which by their very nature can have no application.
(2) Except as provided in section 60-6,378.02, whenever Whenever the
slowness of such animal, animal-drawn vehicle, farm tractor, or implement of
husbandry is obstructing the normal flow of traffic, the rider or driver shall
drive to the nearest available shoulder of the highway and allow traffic to
pass.
Sec. 3. Section 60-6,193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-6,193 (1) No person shall drive a motor vehicle at such a slow speed as
to impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic except when reduced
speed is necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law.
(2) On a freeway no motor vehicle, except emergency vehicles, shall be
operated at a speed of less than forty miles per hour or at such a slow speed
as to impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic except when
reduced speed is necessary for the safe operation of the motor vehicle because
of weather, visibility, roadway, or traffic conditions. All vehicles entering
or leaving such freeway from an acceleration or deceleration lane shall conform
with the minimum speed regulations while they are within the roadway of the
freeway. The minimum speed of forty miles per hour may be altered by the
Department of Transportation or local authorities on freeways under their
respective jurisdictions.
(3) Whenever the department or any local authority within its respective
jurisdiction determines on the basis of an engineering and traffic
investigation that low speeds on any part of a highway consistently impede the
normal and reasonable movement of traffic, the department or such local
authority may determine and declare a minimum speed limit below which no person
shall drive a vehicle except when necessary for safe operation or in compliance
with law.
-1-

LB977 LB977
2026 2026
(4) Vehicular, animal, and pedestrian traffic prohibited on freeways by
the Nebraska Rules of the Road and any individual who is leading, herding, or
driving livestock as defined in section 60-6,378.02 on or along a highway shall
not travel on any other roadway where minimum speed limits of twenty miles per
hour or more are posted.
(5) Any minimum speed limit that which is imposed under subsection (2) or
(3) of this section shall not be effective until appropriate and adequate signs
are erected along the roadway affected by such regulation apprising motorists
of such limitation.
(6) On any freeway, or other highway providing for two or more lanes of
travel in one direction, vehicles shall not intentionally impede the normal
flow of traffic by traveling side by side and at the same speed while in
adjacent lanes. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent vehicles from
traveling side by side in adjacent lanes because of congested traffic
conditions.
Sec. 4. Section 60-6,376, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-6,376 (1) Any person who operates an electric personal assistive
mobility device on a highway shall have all of the rights and shall be subject
to all of the duties applicable to the operator of a vehicle under the Nebraska
Rules of the Road except (a) as provided in special electric personal assistive
mobility device regulations adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Rules of the Road,
(b) any provisions of the Nebraska Rules of the Road which by their nature can
have no application, and (c) as provided in section 60-6,142 with respect to
operating an electric personal assistive mobility device on a shoulder of a
highway.
(2) An electric personal assistive mobility device may be operated on any
highway, alley, sidewalk, bike trail, path, or any other area where persons
travel, except as provided by the Department of Transportation or local
authority. Regulations applicable to an electric personal assistive mobility
device shall apply whenever an electric personal assistive mobility device is
so operated.
(3) An operator of an electric personal assistive mobility device shall
yield to vulnerable road users, pedestrian traffic, and any human-powered or
animal-powered vehicle at all times. An operator of an electric personal
assistive mobility device shall give an audible signal before overtaking and
passing any vulnerable road user, pedestrian, or human-powered or animal-
powered vehicle. A person violating this subsection shall be fined ten dollars
for the first offense. A person violating this subsection shall have his or her
electric personal assistive mobility device impounded for up to thirty days for
each subsequent offense.
Sec. 5. Section 60-6,378.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
60-6,378.02 (1) The operator of a motor vehicle shall proceed with due
care and caution as described in subsection (2) of this section when
approaching or passing a vulnerable road user.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) (2)(a) If there are at least two adjacent lanes of travel in the same
direction on the same side of the highway as the vulnerable road user, the
driver of the approaching or passing motor vehicle shall proceed with due care
and caution and yield the right-of-way when approaching or passing the
vulnerable road user by moving into a lane at least one moving lane apart from
the vulnerable road user unless directed otherwise by any peace officer,
authorized emergency personnel, or road assistance personnel as defined in
section 60-6,378; and .
(b) If there are not two adjacent lanes of travel in the same direction on
the same side of the highway as the vulnerable road user or if moving into
another lane is not reasonably possible as defined in section 60-6,378, the
driver of the approaching or passing vehicle shall:
(i) Reduce his or her speed;
(ii) Maintain a safe speed with regard to the location of the vulnerable
road user, the weather conditions, the road conditions, and vehicular or
pedestrian traffic; and
(iii) Proceed with due care and caution or proceed as directed by any
peace officer, authorized emergency personnel, or road assistance personnel.
(3)(a) For purposes of this subsection, livestock means any horse, mule,
donkey, cattle, swine, sheep, or goat.
(b) Any person who is operating a motor vehicle upon a highway shall:
(i) Use caution when approaching or passing any person who is leading,
herding, or driving livestock on or along the highway;
(ii) Promptly stop such motor vehicle if a person who is leading, herding,
or driving livestock on or along the highway gives a distress signal to the
motor vehicle by raising a hand; and
(iii) Yield the right of way to livestock being led, herded, or driven on
or along the highway.
(c) Subdivision (b) of this subsection does not apply if moving the motor
vehicle is necessary to avoid an accident.
(4) (3) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a:
(a) Class IIIA misdemeanor for a second or subsequent violation committed
within five years after a conviction for a violation of this section; or
(b) Traffic infraction for any other violation.
(5) (4) This section does not grant any vulnerable road user the right to
be on or along any highway in violation of any other state or local law.
-2-

LB977 LB977
2026 2026
Sec. 6. Original sections 60-6,111, 60-6,193, and 60-6,376, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-676.01 and 60-6,378.02, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-3-